Utah statutes.
48-2a-601.   Interim distributions.

Except as provided in this article, a partner is entitled to receive distributions from a limited partnership before his withdrawal from the limited partnership and before the dissolution and winding up thereof to the extent and at the times or upon the happening of the events specified in the partnership agreement.



Amended by Chapter 189, 1991 General Session 

Repealed by Chapter 353, 2011 General Session

